Florida, session 2026, SB1208.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 768.28, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 768.28âWaiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions; 15 recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a 16 riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations; 17 exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.â 18 (2)âAs used in this act, âstate agencies or subdivisionsâ 19 include the executive departments, the Legislature, the judicial 20 branch (including public defenders), county constitutional 21 officers, and the independent establishments of the state, 22 including state university boards of trustees; counties and 23 municipalities; and corporations primarily acting as 24 instrumentalities or agencies of the state, counties, or 25 municipalities, including the Florida Space Authority. 26 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.